Wyoming, session 2025, HB0027.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-2-213(d)(iv)(D) is amended to
read:
31-2-213. Department to supply registration
certificates, plates and stickers; removable windshield
placards.
(d) As used in this section:
(iv) "Removable windshield placard" means a two
(2) sided, tamper resistant, hooked placard which includes
on each side:
(D) An expiration date for a temporary
removable placard or the word "permanent" for a permanent
removable placard.
Section 2. The department of transportation shall
promulgate rules as necessary to implement this act.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0027
ENROLLED ACT NO. 2, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective January 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2